Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-196
Insolvent banks; liquidation; injunction; appeal; bond.

An appeal shall operate as a stay of judgment of the district court, and no bond need be given if the appeal is taken by the director, but if the appeal is taken by such bank, a bond shall be given as required by law for appeal in civil cases.

Laws 1933, c. 18, § 53, p. 162;

Laws 1935, c. 16, § 1, p. 89;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-190;

R.S.1943, § 8-182;

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 96, p. 172;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 13.